Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7006.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-18-30B of the General Laws in Chapter 44-18 entitled "Sales and
Use Taxes — Liability and Computation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-18-30B. Exemption from sales tax for sales by writers, composers, artists —
Findings.
(a) The general assembly makes the following findings of facts:
(1) The arts and culture are a significant asset for Rhode Island, one that generates revenue
through increased tourism and economic activity; creates jobs and economic opportunities;
revitalizes communities adding to quality of life and property values; and fosters creativity,
innovation, and entrepreneurship.
(2) Since 1998, the establishment of arts districts, where “one-of-a-kind, limited-
production” works of art may be sold exempt from state sales tax, has resulted in an increased
presence for the arts in designated cities and towns, with benefits to those communities and to the
state.
(3) Since the establishment of arts districts, many communities have sought legislation to
expand the program to their city or town.
(4) There is value in expanding the arts district program statewide, providing incentives for
the sale and purchase of art. This is a unique opportunity for Rhode Island to shape history, and
gain an advantage over other states, by becoming the first-and-only state in the country to declare

a statewide sales tax exemption on art. This will strengthen Rhode Island’s identity as an arts-
friendly destination and “State of the Arts.”
(b)(1) This section only applies to sales by writers, composers, and artists residing in and
conducting a business within the state of Rhode Island. For the purposes of this section, a “work”
means an original and creative work, whether written, composed, or executed for “one-of-a-kind,
limited production” that falls into one of the following categories:
(i) A book or other writing;
(ii) A play or the performance of said play;
(iii) A musical composition or the performance of said composition;
(iv) A painting, print, photograph, or other like picture;
(v) A sculpture;
(vi) Traditional and fine crafts;
(vii) The creation of a film or the acting within the film; or
(viii) The creation of a dance or the performance of the dance.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a “work” includes any product generated as a result of
any of the above categories.
(3) For the purposes of this section, a “work” does not apply to any piece or performance
created or executed for industry-oriented, commercial, or related production.
(4) For the purposes of this section, a “book or other writing” means a one-of-a-kind limited
production, up to the sale of one thousand five hundred (1,500) copies, regardless of the methods
by which it is published or sold; provided, however, that any third-party electronic sales, and sales
from bookstores, gift shops and other retail outlets, shall not be exempt from the sales tax.
(c)(1) This section applies to sales by any individual:
(i) Who is a resident of, and has a principal place of business situated in, the state of Rhode
Island.
(ii) Who is determined by the tax administrator in consultation with the Rhode Island
council on the arts, after consideration of any evidence he or she deems necessary or that is
submitted to him or her by the individual, to have written, composed, or executed, either solely or
jointly, a work or works that would fall into one of the categories listed in subsection (b)(1).
(2) This section also applies to sales by any other gallery located in the state of Rhode
Island.
(3) The tax administrator shall not make a determination unless:
(i) The individual(s) concerned duly make(s) an application to the tax administrator for the
sales tax exemption that applies to the works defined in this section; and
LC003561 - Page 2 of 5

(ii) The individual has complied and continues to comply with any and all requests made
by the tax administrator.
(d) Any individual to whom this section applies, and who makes an application to the tax
administrator, is entitled to a sales tax exemption for the sale of a work or works sold from the
individual’s business located in the State of Rhode Island that would, apart from this section, be
subject to the tax rate imposed by the state of Rhode Island.
(e) When an individual makes a request for the exemption, the tax administrator is entitled
to all books, documents, or other evidence relating to the publication, production, or creation of the
works that may be deemed necessary by the tax administrator for the purposes of the exemption.
The time period in which to provide this information is in the sole discretion of the tax administrator
and specified in the notice.
(f) In addition to the information required in subsection (e), the tax administrator may
require the individual(s) to submit an annual, certified accounting of the numbers of works sold;
the type of work sold; and the date of the sale. Failure to file this report may, in the sole discretion
of the tax administrator, terminate the individual’s eligibility for the exemption.
(g) Any person storing, using, or otherwise consuming in this state any work or works
deemed to be exempt from the sales tax pursuant to this section is not liable for the use tax on the
work or works.
(h) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, any individual to whom this section may
apply shall comply with all the administration, collection, and other provisions of chapters 18 and
19 of this title.
(i) The certificate of exemption shall be valid for four (4) years from the date of issue. All
certificates issued prior to the effective date of this section shall expire four (4) years from the
effective date of this section.
(j) The Rhode Island council on the arts will oversee the transition to a statewide arts district
program and work with the state tourism agencies; local chambers of commerce; and
advertising/marketing agencies to promote this program, and will coordinate its efforts with the
city and town governments. The Rhode Island council on the arts may request, and shall receive,
from any department, division, board, bureau, commission, or agency of the state any data,
assistance, and resources, including additional personnel, that will enable it to properly carry out
this program.
(k) The tax administrator, in cooperation with the Rhode Island council on the arts, will
gather data to assess the overall impact of the statewide arts district program, and issue an annual
report including, but not limited to, the impact of the tax exemption on employment, tourism, sales,
LC003561 - Page 3 of 5

and spending within the arts sector and adjacent businesses, and any other factors that describe the
impact of the program.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003561
========
LC003561 - Page 4 of 5